Utah statutes.
34-40-202.   Enforcement.

The division shall enforce this chapter and investigate complaints under this chapter.  The  division may commence administrative proceedings in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and may impose a penalty of up to $500 per violation of this chapter.

